California statutes. Education Code
(ii) If not exempt from the February deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school
 district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before February 1, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments
 in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be prioritized according to the date on which the certification described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the
 Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before February 26, 2021.

(b) (1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of March, that are instead to be drawn in October, pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in March, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in March pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants
 pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for March or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for March and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in March pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for March or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to
 meet its financial obligations for March and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the March deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before February 1, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall determine whether
 sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be prioritized according to the date on which the certification described in paragraph
 (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before March 30, 2021.

(c) (1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of April, that are instead to be drawn in September, pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in April, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in April pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before
 December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for April or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for April and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in April pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for April or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of
 additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for April and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the April deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before February 1, the Controller, the Treasurer, and
 the Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be prioritized according to the date on
 which the certification described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before April 30, 2021.

(d) (1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of May, that are instead to be drawn in August, pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in May, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in May pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and
 the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for May or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for May and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in May pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for May or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an
 estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for May and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the May deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of
 Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before February 1, the
 Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be
 prioritized according to the date on which the certification described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before May 28, 2021.

(e) (1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, that are instead to be drawn in July pursuant to Section 14041.5, may be drawn in June, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall
 certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.5 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for June and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.5 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the
 Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for June and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the June deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3
 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before May 1,
 the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be
 prioritized according to the date on which the certification described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before June 30, 2021.

(f) (1) For the 2024–25 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, that are instead to be drawn in July pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in June, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall
 certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before April 1, 2025, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for June and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before April 1, 2025, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall
 provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for June and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the June deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320)
 of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before
 May 1, 2025, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be
 prioritized according to the date on which the certification described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before June 30, 2025.

(g) (1) For the 2025–26 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, that are instead to be drawn in July pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in June, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the
 chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before April 1, 2026, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or July, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for June and July, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in June pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before April 1, 2026, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for June or July, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the
 amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for June and July, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(ii) If not exempt from the June deferral the school district will require a state emergency loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(D) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this subdivision, no more than the lesser of the monthly payment for the charter school or school district calculated pursuant to Section 14041 or the amount of funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable.

(2) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). On or before May 1, 2026, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance
 shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the amount of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(3) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to paragraph (2) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (1), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be prioritized according to the date on which the certification
 described in paragraph (1) was provided to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(4) Payments pursuant to this subdivision shall be made by the Controller on or before June 30, 2026.

(h) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 41202, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivisions (a) to
 (g), inclusive, shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 11.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.

(a) If the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the chancellor does not certify to the Controller, on or before the 20th day of February, the amounts apportioned by him as the first principal apportionment, the Controller shall draw warrants on the State Treasury in favor of the county treasurer of each county in the month of February, and in each month thereafter until the month following his receipt of such certification, for amounts equal to the warrants drawn for January.

(b) In the month following the receipt of the certification of the amounts apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges as the first principal apportionment, the Controller shall draw warrants on the State Treasury in favor of the county treasurer of each county in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of the warrants which would have been drawn pursuant to Section 14041 had the certification been received by the Controller not later than February 20th and the amount of the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) Warrants drawn under this section shall be drawn on the State School Fund and are not subject to the provisions of Government Code Section 925.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.

All moneys received by the treasurer of any county from the apportionments of the State School Fund shall be immediately credited by the treasurer to the county school service fund, the county school tuition fund, and the general funds of the several school districts of the county exactly as apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14044.

(a) Upon determining that any semiannual report to the State Department of Education, as required under Section 628.2 of the Penal Code, has not been submitted, or that a submitted report contains intentionally misleading data, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may withhold an amount from the next state funding apportionment to which the school district or, as appropriate, the county office of education, would otherwise be entitled. The amount so withheld shall not exceed one-half of the annual salary of the superintendent of that district or of that county superintendent of schools, respectively.

(b) Any funds withheld pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be held in trust by the Superintendent of Public Instruction until he or she determines that the data required under Section 628.2 of the Penal Code has been submitted, in complete and accurate form, by the appropriate school district or county office of education whereupon those funds shall be released to the appropriate county treasury to the credit of that district or county office of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County School Service Funds—Computation of Allowances and Budgetary Requirements [14050. - 14058.]

14050.

The county superintendent of schools shall on or before June 30 of each year submit a tentative budget and, on or before October 1 of each year, a final budget to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the succeeding fiscal year, in the form that the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prescribe, setting forth all known and estimated revenues of the county school service fund for the succeeding fiscal year from all sources, and the proposed expenditures from the county school service fund for the succeeding fiscal year. The budget shall be approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. When a budget is submitted to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for his or her approval, he or she shall make a review of each program prior to approving the budget. No allowance shall be made under Sections 14050 to 14056, inclusive, whichever are in effect, to a county superintendent of schools for any item of current expenses or capital outlay with respect to which the county superintendent has failed to comply with the regulations of the Superintendent of Public Instruction which he or she is herewith authorized to adopt applicable to such item. The regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction hereunder shall not be limited to, but shall, among other matters:

(a) Prescribe procedures relating to budgeting, purchasing and replacing capital outlay items.

(b) Prescribe procedures relating to the purchase, replacement, operation and maintenance of automotive equipment.

(c) Prescribe the conditions under which the county superintendent of schools may provide services to districts by contract.

(d) Prescribe the conditions under which allowances may be made to the county superintendent of schools to contract for the services of special consultants. 

(e) Prescribe the conditions under which allowances may be made to the county superintendent of schools to assume functions authorized by law to be performed either by the county superintendent of schools or another public agency.

(f) Prescribe conditions under which allowances will be made to meet conditions of an emergency nature requiring the establishment and maintenance of emergency schools, the providing of emergency teachers for regular elementary schools, the providing of emergency transportation to regular elementary schools, or emergency apportionments to school districts.

(g) Define county school service fund publications and prescribe the procedures to be followed relating to budgeting, printing and distributing those publications.

Upon the approval of the budget by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, he or she shall note his or her approval thereon and transmit one copy thereof to the county superintendent of schools and one copy to the county auditor of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

The State Board of Education shall establish definitions for publications, and each county superintendent of schools, upon making any publication shall transmit a copy thereof to the State Board of Education.

In evaluating and analyzing justification documents, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be advised by an advisory committee composed of county superintendents of schools, which committee the Superintendent of Public Instruction is hereby authorized to appoint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 843.)
-------------------------------------------

14054.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall during each fiscal year allow to the county school service fund of each county from the State School Fund such amounts as the budget submitted by the county superintendent of schools and approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, under Section 14050, shows is necessary, but:

(a) The total amount allowed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction under this section to all county school service funds for supervision of instruction and health, attendance, and guidance services pursuant to Sections 1730 to 1762, inclusive, for pupils in elementary school districts which during the next preceding fiscal year had less than 901 units of average daily attendance, in high school districts which, during the preceding year had less than 301 units of average daily attendance, and in unified school districts which during the next preceding fiscal year had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance shall not exceed the sum provided by law for such purpose or the amounts shown necessary by such budgets, for such purpose, whichever is the lesser.

(b) The total amount allowed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction under this section to all county school service funds for all other purposes shall not exceed the sum provided by law for such purposes or the amounts shown necessary by such budgets, whichever is the lesser.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14055.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow at such times as needed to the county school service fund of each county eligible to receive reimbursement from the amount credited to the county school service fund contingency account in the State General Fund, the amounts claimed by the county superintendent of schools as expenditures from the county school service fund eligible for reimbursement. No amounts for purposes specified in Section 14035 shall be included in the budgets submitted by a county superintendent of schools to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14056.

The budget submitted pursuant to Section 14050 shall include an amount equal to that specified by law as the state’s contribution toward payment of the annual salary of the county superintendent of schools to be used exclusively for the partial payment of the annual salary of the county superintendent of schools. Such amount shall be paid for such purpose from the allowance made to the county school service fund pursuant to Section 14054.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14057.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow, in addition to all other allowances, to the county school service funds: (a) for all emergency schools maintained in each elementary school district of the county by the county superintendent of schools, and (b) each elementary school maintained in juvenile halls, juvenile homes, and juvenile camps, by the county superintendent of schools, and all opportunity schools and classes maintained by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 48633 and 48634.

No allowance shall be made for emergency schools which is in excess of the actual expense of maintaining the emergency school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

14058.
